Utah statutes.
79-3-301.   Board of Utah Geological Survey created.

(1)  There is created within the department the Board of the Utah Geological Survey.

(2)  The board is the policymaking body for the survey.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 344, 2009 General Session

